California, session 20252026, SB993.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4980.32 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.32. (a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of marriage and family therapists. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date.(2) (A) In any of the following practice settings, an employing entity or agency of a licensee or registrant may exercise discretion whether to include any or all of the information required by paragraph (1) in the notice required by subdivision (a) based on individual safety concerns if the setting has an established process by which the client may request and obtain sufficient identification information to file a complaint with the board, that process is disclosed to the client as part of the notice, and a copy of the notice is preserved as part of the client’s records:(A)(i) An acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(B)(ii) A correctional treatment center, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(C)(iii) Any setting where mental health services are provided to incarcerated individuals under the jurisdiction of a local, state, or federal correctional authority, including, but not limited to, a state prison, county jail, juvenile detention facility, or other correctional setting operated by, or under contract with, a governmental entity.(B) If the discretion authorized by this paragraph is exercised, the licensee or registrant shall be responsible for ensuring the process to request and obtain identification information required by subparagraph (A) is in place.(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.SEC. 2. Section 4989.17 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4989.17. (a) A licensee shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychological services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of licensed educational psychologists. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.(b) On and after July 1, 2025, (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon initiation of psychological services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s full name as filed with the board, the license number, the type of license, and the license expiration date.(2) (A) In any of the following practice settings, an employing entity or agency of a licensee may exercise discretion whether to include any or all of the information required by paragraph (1) in the notice required by subdivision (a) based on individual safety concerns if the setting has an established process by which the client may request and obtain sufficient identification information to file a complaint with the board, that process is disclosed to the client as part of the notice, and a copy of the notice is preserved as part of the client’s records:(i) An acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) A correctional treatment center, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(iii) Any setting where mental health services are provided to incarcerated individuals under the jurisdiction of a local, state, or federal correctional authority, including, but not limited to, a state prison, county jail, juvenile detention facility, or other correctional setting operated by, or under contract with, a governmental entity.(B) If the discretion authorized by this paragraph is exercised, the licensee shall be responsible for ensuring the process to request and obtain identification information required by subparagraph (A) is in place.(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.SEC. 3. Section 4996.75 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.75. (a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of clinical social workers. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.(b) On and after July 1, 2025, (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date.(2) (A) In any of the following practice settings, an employing entity or agency of a licensee or registrant may exercise discretion whether to include any or all of the information required by paragraph (1) in the notice required by subdivision (a) based on individual safety concerns if the setting has an established process by which the client may request and obtain sufficient identification information to file a complaint with the board, that process is disclosed to the client as part of the notice, and a copy of the notice is preserved as part of the client’s records:(i) An acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) A correctional treatment center, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(iii) Any setting where mental health services are provided to incarcerated individuals under the jurisdiction of a local, state, or federal correctional authority, including, but not limited to, a state prison, county jail, juvenile detention facility, or other correctional setting operated by, or under contract with, a governmental entity.(B) If the discretion authorized by this paragraph is exercised, the licensee or registrant shall be responsible for ensuring the process to request and obtain identification information required by subparagraph (A) is in place.(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.SEC. 4. Section 4999.71 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.71. (a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of professional clinical counselors. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.(b) On and after July 1, 2025, (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date.(2) (A) In any of the following practice settings, an employing entity or agency of a licensee or registrant may exercise discretion whether to include any or all of the information required by paragraph (1) in the notice required by subdivision (a) based on individual safety concerns if the setting has an established process by which the client may request and obtain sufficient identification information to file a complaint with the board, that process is disclosed to the client as part of the notice, and a copy of the notice is preserved as part of the client’s records:(i) An acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) A correctional treatment center, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(iii) Any setting where mental health services are provided to incarcerated individuals under the jurisdiction of a local, state, or federal correctional authority, including, but not limited to, a state prison, county jail, juvenile detention facility, or other correctional setting operated by, or under contract with, a governmental entity.(B) If the discretion authorized by this paragraph is exercised, the licensee or registrant shall be responsible for ensuring the process to request and obtain identification information required by subparagraph (A) is in place.(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.